Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2277.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-47-2, 11-47-11, 11-47-12 and 11-47-18 of the General Laws in
Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-2. Definitions.
When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases are construed as follows:
(1) “3D printing process” means 3D printing or additive manufacturing which is a process
of making three (3) dimensional solid objects from a computer file and shall include any of various
processes in which material is joined or solidified under computer control to create a three (3)
dimensional object, with material being added together including liquid molecules or powder
grains.
(2) “Antique firearm” is defined as that term is defined under the provisions of 18 U.S.C.
§ 921.
(3) “Binary trigger” means a device that replaces a standard trigger on a semi-automatic
weapon and is designed to fire one round on the pull of the trigger and another round upon release
of the trigger.
(4) “Bump-fire stock” means any device that replaces a semi-automatic weapon’s standard
stock and is designed to slide back and forth rapidly, harnessing the weapon’s recoil to rapidly fire
the weapon.
(5) “Crime gun” means any firearm used in a crime or identified by law enforcement as
suspected of having been used in a criminal offense.

(6) “Crime of violence” means and includes any of the following crimes or an attempt to
commit any of them: murder, manslaughter, rape, first- or second-degree sexual assault, first- or
second-degree child molestation, kidnapping, first- and second-degree arson, mayhem, robbery,
burglary, breaking and entering, any felony violation involving the illegal manufacture, sale, or
delivery of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver a
controlled substance classified in schedule I or schedule II of § 21-28-2.08, any violation of § 21-
28-4.01.1 or § 21-28-4.01.2 or conspiracy to commit any violation of these statutes, assault with a
dangerous weapon, assault or battery involving grave bodily injury, or assault with intent to commit
any offense punishable as a felony; upon any conviction of an offense punishable as a felony
offense under § 12-29-5.
(7) “Firearm” includes any machine gun, pistol, rifle, air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun,” “BB
gun,” or other instrument from which steel or metal projectiles are propelled, or that may readily
be converted to expel a projectile, except crossbows, recurve, compound, or longbows, and except
instruments propelling projectiles that are designed or normally used for a primary purpose other
than as a weapon. The frame or receiver of the weapon shall be construed as a firearm under the
provisions of this section.
(8) “Fugitive from justice” means any person who has fled from any state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or possession of the United States to avoid prosecution for a crime of violence
or to avoid giving testimony in any criminal proceeding.
(9) “Ghost gun” means a firearm, including a frame or receiver, that lacks a unique serial
number engraved or cased in metal alloy on the frame or receiver by a licensed manufacturer,
maker, or importer under federal law or markings in accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. It does
not include a firearm that has been rendered permanently inoperable, or a firearm that is not
required to have a serial number in accordance with the federal Gun Control Act of 1968.
(10) “Licensing authorities” means the board of police commissioners of a city or town
where the board has been instituted, the chief of police or superintendent of police of other cities
and towns having a regular organized police force, and, in towns where there is no chief of police
or superintendent of police, it means the town clerk who may issue licenses upon the
recommendation of the town sergeant, and it also means any other person or body duly authorized
by the city or town charter or by state law.
(11) “Machine gun” means any weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily
restored to shoot automatically more than one shot, without manual reloading, by a single function
of the trigger. The term also includes the frame or receiver of the weapon, any combination of parts
designed and intended for use in converting a weapon into a machine gun, and any combination of
LC003293 - Page 2 of 19

parts from which a machine gun can be assembled if the parts are in the possession or under the
control of a person.
(12) “Major component” means, with respect to a firearm:
(i) The slide or cylinder or the frame or receiver of the firearm; and
(ii) In the case of a rifle or shotgun, includes the barrel of the firearm.
(13) “Person” includes an individual, partnership, firm, association, or corporation.
(14) “Pistol” includes any pistol or revolver, and any shotgun, rifle, or similar weapon with
overall length less than twenty-six inches (26″), but does not include any pistol or revolver designed
for the use of blank cartridges only.
(15) “Rifle” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(c), and by barrel length
and overall length not be subject to registration pursuant to the National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C.
ch. 53 (prior § 5801 et seq.).
(16) “Sawed-off rifle” means any rifle with overall length of less than twenty-six inches
(26″) or barrel length of less than sixteen inches (16″).
(17) “Sawed-off shotgun” means any shotgun with overall length of less than twenty-six
inches (26″) or barrel length of less than eighteen inches (18″).
(18) “Sell” includes let or hire, give, lend, and transfer, and “purchase” includes hire,
accept, and borrow, and “purchasing” shall be construed accordingly.
(19) “Shotgun” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(d), and by barrel length
and overall length not be subject to registration pursuant to the National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C.
ch. 53 (prior § 5801 et seq.).
(20) "Suitable person" means any person who is not prohibited by state law from possessing
a pistol or revolver; provided, however, a person may be considered unsuitable if the licensing
authority has clear and convincing evidence that the person is a clear and present danger to
themself, or to another person, or any person may be considered unsuitable if the law enforcement
agency conducting the background check or the department of attorney general has evidence which
supports a good faith belief that the person is a member of a criminal street gang as defined in §
12-19-39(a).
(20)(21) “Trigger crank” means a trigger actuator that attaches to the trigger of a semi-
automatic weapon and causes the weapon to fire by turning the crank handle.
(21)(22) “Undetectable firearm” means any firearm that:
(i) After removal of all parts, other than a major component, is not as detectable by walk-
through metal detectors commonly used at airports or other public buildings; or
(ii) Any major component of which, if subjected to inspection by the types of detection
LC003293 - Page 3 of 19

devices commonly used at airports or other public buildings for security screening, would not
generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the component; or
(iii) Is manufactured wholly of plastic, fiberglass, or through a 3D printing process; or
(iv) Upon which the frame or receiver lacks a unique serial number engraved or cased into
on the frame or receiver by a licensed manufacturer, maker, or importer under federal law, or
markings in accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. Provided, however, this subsection shall not
apply to any firearm rendered permanently inoperable or a firearm manufactured prior to 1968.
11-47-11. License or permit to carry concealed pistol or revolver.
(a) The licensing authorities of any city or town shall, upon application of any person
twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence or place of business within the
city or town, or of any person twenty-one (21) years of age or over having a bona fide residence
within the United States and a license or permit to carry a pistol or revolver concealed upon his or
her person issued by the authorities of any other state or subdivision of the United States, issue a
license or permit to the person to carry concealed upon his or her person a pistol or revolver
everywhere within this state for four (4) years from date of issue, if it appears that the applicant has
good reason to fear an injury to his or her person or property or has any other proper lawful reason
for carrying a pistol or revolver, and that he or she the applicant is a suitable person to be so
licensed, subject to the provisions of §§ 11-47-12 and 11-47-15. Self-defense shall be considered a
proper purpose and lawful reason.
(1) The license or permit shall be in triplicate in form to be prescribed by the attorney
general and shall bear the fingerprint, photograph, name, address, description, and signature of the
licensee and the reason given for desiring a license or permit and in no case shall it contain the
serial number of any firearm. The original shall be delivered to the licensee.
(2) The licensing authority shall retain a copy of the permit for its records and send a second
copy to the department of attorney general. All permits issued or renewed pursuant to this section
shall be recorded in the Rhode Island criminal history database, or its successor system.
(3) Any member of the licensing authority, its agents, servants, and employees shall be
immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any official act or decision, performed
or made in good faith in issuing a license or permit under this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any other chapter or section of the general laws of the state of Rhode
Island, the licensing authority of any city or town shall not provide or release to any individual,
firm, association or corporation the name, address, or date of birth of any person who has held or
currently holds a license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or revolver. This section shall not be
construed to prohibit the release of any statistical data of a general nature relative to age, gender
LC003293 - Page 4 of 19

and racial or ethnic background nor shall it be construed to prevent the release of information to
parties involved in any prosecution of § 11-47-8 or in response to a lawful subpoena in any criminal
or civil action which the person is a party to that action.
(c) The licensing authority shall, within fourteen (14) calendar days, return any incomplete
application to the applicant along with a written explanation, stating with specificity, why the
application is incomplete.
(d) The licensing authority shall approve or deny a complete application within ninety (90)
calendar days of receiving it.
(1) Within seven (7) business days after approval, the license shall be made available for
the applicant to pick up in person or, at the request and expense of the applicant be delivered by
mail.
(2) Any denial shall be in writing and state with specificity the reason(s) and evidence upon
which the licensing authority based its decision and the rationale for the denial.
(3) Failure by the licensing authority to approve or deny an application within the time
allowed shall constitute a denial for the sole purpose of permitting an appeal by the applicant and
for no other purpose, and shall create a presumption that no evidence exists indicating that the
applicant is unsuitable.
(e) Any permit issued pursuant to this section is eligible to be renewed if it is not expired,
or has been expired for less than six (6) months. Any person whose permit has been expired for six
(6) months or more may apply for a new permit under this section.
(f) Each licensing authority shall make its application available to any person by:
(1) Posting it on its website, if it has one; and
(2) Making it immediately available, free of charge, to any person who requests it; and
(3) Upon request, providing a copy by regular mail using the United States Postal Service.
(g) All applications shall require two (2) forms of identification, including, but not limited
to, a driver’s license, state issued non-driver identification card, concealed carry permit issued by
any state or political subdivision of any state, passport, immigration documentation, military
identification, student identification, social security card or a birth certificate. At least one of these
shall be a government issued photo identification.
(1) The licensing authority may only use the applicant’s social security number for the
background check.
(h) All applications shall include a Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) fingerprint card
(FD-258), or successor version, or provide fingerprints by live-scan, with the application, except
that this information shall not be a requirement for a renewal applicant.
LC003293 - Page 5 of 19

(i) All applications shall include a copy of the instructor’s credentials for the instructor who
certified their firing score on their application.
(j) All licensing authorities of a city or town shall use the following application:
Application for a concealed carry license pursuant to RIGL § 11-47-11
Name: __________________________________________________________________
Address:
__________________________________________________________________
(Street and number) (City or town) (State) (ZIP)
Date of Birth: _________________ Place of Birth_____________________
Height: __________ Weight: __________ Color hair: ___________ Color eyes: __
Are you a citizen of the United States?_____________________
If you are not a US citizen, please list your admission/INS number: ____________
ARMY L or RI COMBAT COURSE shooting score: ______________________
Name and certification number of NRA or RI instructor: _____________________
Signature of instructor: ____________________________________________________
Have you ever been convicted of a crime of violence (Pursuant to §11-47-2)? ____
Are you a fugitive from justice (Pursuant to § 11-47-2)?______________________
Have you ever been adjudicated as being addicted to a controlled substance (Pursuant to §
11-47-6)? __________________________
Have you ever been adjudicated as being mentally incompetent (Pursuant to § 11-47-6)?
_______
Have you been dishonorably discharged from the United States Military? _______
To your knowledge, are you prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm?
__________
For what lawful purpose do you seek to carry a pistol or revolver?
______________________________________________________________
Applicant's signature: ______________________________________________________
(See § 11-47-23 for penalty for false information provided on this application)
AFFIDAVIT: I certify that I have read and am familiar with the provisions of chapter 47
of title 11 entitled "Weapons", of the general laws of the State of Rhode Island and that I am aware
of the penalties for violation of the provisions of chapter 47 of title 11.
Signed before me under penalties of perjury by____________________, known to me
personally or did present a valid photo identification card which
was_________________________
LC003293 - Page 6 of 19

County of _________________
State of Rhode Island
Subscribed and sworn before me this ____ of ________________, 20____
Notary Public
Notary Public number:________________
(k) No licensing authority shall require any additional forms, standards, information,
waivers or other additional requirements unless specifically requested by, or provided by, the
applicant.
(l) The licensing authority shall establish and maintain an emergency permit extension on
the renewal application for a license to carry a concealed weapon.
(1) The emergency permit extension is only available to renewal applicants who, at the
time of the application, have an unexpired four (4) year city or town issued license to carry a
concealed weapon and who are required to maintain this license for work purposes.
(2) A complete renewal application shall be delivered to the licensing authority prior to the
license expiration date.
(3) The licensing authority shall, within three (3) business days of receipt of the renewal
application if there is no material change in the renewal application, no material change in need
and no change in the applicant’s criminal history, automatically approve and make available the
emergency permit.
(4) A fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be paid to the licensing authority for the emergency
permit extension upon the issuance of the emergency permit.
(5) An emergency license to carry a concealed weapon shall be valid for ninety (90) days
only.
(6) Nothing in the emergency permit extension section shall be construed or interpreted to
stay or toll the time periods in the renewal process as outlined in subsection (e) of this section.
11-47-12. License or permit fee.
A fee of forty dollars ($40.00) shall be charged and shall be paid for each a license or
permit to the licensing authority or the department of attorney general upon issuance issuing it. No
additional fees or costs of any type shall be charged or assessed for any reason, except, that the
applicant may be assessed the actual cost charged by the FBI to process their prints. Every license
or permit shall be valid for four (4) years from the date when issued unless sooner revoked, subject
to the emergency permit provisions of § 11-47-11. The fee charged for issuing of the license or
permit shall be applied for the use and benefit of the city, town, or state of Rhode Island the
department of attorney general.
LC003293 - Page 7 of 19

11-47-18. License or permit issued by attorney general on showing of need — Issuance
to retired police officers.
(a) The attorney general may shall issue a license or permit to any person twenty-one (21)
years of age or over to carry a pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, upon his or her person
everywhere within this state for four (4) years from the date of issue upon a proper showing of
need, or the applicant has good reason to fear an injury to their person or property, or for
employment, and that they are a suitable person to be so licensed, subject to the provisions of §§
11-47-12 and 11-47-15; that license or permit may be issued notwithstanding the provisions of §
11-47-7.
(1) No licensing authority shall issue a license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or
revolver to any person in violation of § 11-47-7 and any license or permit issued shall immediately
be revoked.
(b) All state police officers and permanent members of city and town police forces of this
state who have retired in good standing after at least twenty (20) years of service, or retired in good
standing due to a physical disability other than a psychological impairment, may shall be issued a
license or permit by the attorney general subject to the provisions of §§ 11-47-12 and 11-47-15.
The term “in good standing” means that at the time of retirement, the police officer was not facing
disciplinary action that could have resulted in his or her termination for misconduct or unfitness for
office. Any member of the licensing authority, and its agents, servants, and employees shall be
immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any official act or decision, performed
or made in good faith in issuing and/or denying a license or permit under this chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding any other chapter or section of the general laws of the state of Rhode
Island, the attorney general shall not provide or release to any individual, firm, association or
corporation the name, address, or date of birth of any person who has held or currently holds a
license or permit to carry a concealed pistol or revolver. This section shall not be construed to
prohibit the release of any statistical data of a general nature relative to age, gender and racial or
ethnic background nor shall it be construed to prevent the release of information to parties involved
in any prosecution of § 11-47-8 or in response to a lawful subpoena in any criminal or civil action
which said person is a party to such action.
(d) Any permit issued pursuant to this section is eligible to be renewed if it is not expired,
or has been expired for less than six (6) months. Any person whose permit has been expired for six
(6) months or more may apply for a new permit under this section.
(e) The attorney general’s application for a license to carry a pistol or revolver shall be
filled out completely by the applicant, dated and signed by the applicant and notarized.
LC003293 - Page 8 of 19

(f) The attorney general may request only the following information on the application:
(1) The applicant’s full name, prior name if legally changed, all nicknames and aliases, full
residence address and mailing address if different from the applicant’s residence. No post office
box addresses shall be used for a mailing address.
(2) All the applicant’s available phone numbers, including, but not limited to, business,
cellular, mobile and land line phone numbers.
(3) The applicant’s height, weight, color of eyes and hair, date and place of birth, and Social
Security number.
(4) If the permit is being sought as a condition of employment, the applicant’s occupation,
job description, years of employment and employer’s address and contact information.
(5) The applicant’s proof of citizenship, length of citizenship and if the applicant is not a
citizen of the United States, a copy of both sides of a current and valid alien registration card or
work authorization card.
(6) A listing of all of the applicant’s address for the last three (3) years, including the full
address with dates of residence.
(7) Information relating to the applicant’s arrest record including, but not limited to, the
date the applicant was arrested, the name of the city/town or arresting agency, the state in which
the arrest occurred, the arresting charge and disposition.
(8) Information relating to the applicant’s plea of nolo contendere to any charge or violation
including, but not limited to, the date the applicant was arrested, the name of the city/town or
arresting agency, the state in which the plea occurred, the arresting charge and disposition.
(9) Information relating to the applicant’s conviction record, including, but not limited to,
the date the applicant was arrested, the name of the city/town or arresting agency, the state in which
the arrest occurred, the arresting charge and disposition.
(10) Information relating to the applicant’s indictment in any court for a crime punishable
by a sentence of more than one year, including, but not limited to, the name of the city/town or
indicting agency, the state of the indictment, the indicting charge and disposition.
(11) Information relating to whether the applicant was ever under a guardianship or been
subject to confinement by virtue of being a mental incompetent, or who has been adjudicated or is
under treatment or confinement as a drug addict, including, but not limited to, the dates thereof.
(12) Information relating to the applicant’s current and prior applications for a permit to
carry a pistol or revolver from the Rhode Island attorney general, any local city or town, or any
other state, including, but not limited to, if any permit is active, denied or revoked, with the dates
and reasons thereof. The attorney general may require notarized photocopies of the front and back
LC003293 - Page 9 of 19

of all valid permits.
(13) All non-resident applicants shall include a copy of both the front and the back of their
home state permit, if they have one.
(g) The attorney general may require only the following with the application from an out-
of-state applicant:
(1) A dated, signed and notarized typed statement from the applicant outlining the
applicant’s specific reasons and details regarding the applicant's need for a Rhode Island permit. If
the permit is to be used for employment, a typed and signed letter of explanation shall be submitted
on the applicant’s employer’s letterhead and included with the application. In addition, the
applicant shall submit a copy of the business license or other evidence that the business exists.
(2) The applicant shall enclose two (2) one inch by one inch (1" X 1") pictures of the
applicant taken without headgear or glasses. This photo shall be a clear, colored picture of the head
and face. The applicant shall print their name on the back of each picture. No laminated photos
shall be accepted.
(3) Copies of both the front and the back of two (2) types of positive identification for the
applicant, examples include, but are not limited to, birth certificate, United States passport, a Rhode
Island or other state driver’s license or a Rhode Island identification card, concealed carry permit
issued by any state or political subdivision of any state, military identification, student identification
or social security card. At least one of these documents shall be a government issued photo
identification. The photocopies submitted shall be signed and dated by a notary public attesting to
the photocopies as being true copies.
(i) The licensing authority may only use the applicant’s social security number for the
background check.
(4) The application shall include the applicant’s full set of fingerprints submitted on a FBI
fingerprint identification card {FD-258 (Rev. 12-29-82 or successor version)} included with the
application. The fingerprint card shall be signed by the applicant. Submission of fingerprints shall
not be necessary for a renewal application
(5) Three (3) dated, signed and notarized typed reference letters from individuals who
personally know the applicant. The individuals used as references shall include on the letters the
following information: their full names, residence address, phone number with area code and the
years they have known the applicant. An applicant’s reference letter dated more than one hundred
and twenty (120) days prior to the date of the permit application shall be considered invalid.
Reference letters shall be written by the reference, not the applicant, and cannot be identical.
Submission of letters of reference shall not be necessary for a renewal application.
LC003293 - Page 10 of 19

(6) A certification that the applicant has qualified in accordance with § 11-47-15. (Law
enforcement personnel may submit a certification of the Rhode Island combat course). An N.R.A.
instructor or a police range officer shall sign and complete the certification which shall include the
date of the qualification, the printed name, phone number of the instructor, instructor N.R.A.
number, the caliber of the weapon and the applicant’s score. An applicant’s qualification
certification dated more than one year prior to the date of the permit application shall be considered
invalid.
(7) A copy of the N.R.A. instructor certification and/or the police officer’s range
certification shall be submitted with the application.
(8) The applicant’s legal residence may be required. The residency requirement may be
satisfied by any one of the following methods: the application may be signed by the applicant’s
local licensing authority; the application may be signed by the city or town chief of police; the
application may be signed by the city or town clerk; or the applicant may submit a certified or
notarized copy of the applicant’s voter registration card.
(9) The applicant shall sign an affidavit certifying that the applicant has read and is familiar
with the provisions of §§ 11-47-1 to 11-47-64, inclusive, as amended, and acknowledges the
penalties for violations of the provisions of the cited sections. The applicant shall further attest that
any alteration of the permit is just cause for revocation. The affidavit shall be dated and notarized
and shall indicate the date it was submitted to the licensing authority or the police department.
(h) The attorney general shall, within ninety (90) days for an in-state applicant or one
hundred and twenty (120) days for an out-of-state applicant from the receipt of a complete
application, either approve or deny the application.
(1) If the application is approved, the attorney general may require the applicant to appear
at the department of attorney general to sign and submit a fingerprint card for the permit.
(2) If the attorney general denies the application, the applicant shall be notified, either by
mail or by phone, that the entire application is available for pick-up by the applicant. Any denial
shall be in writing and state with specificity the reason(s) and evidence upon which the denial was
based and the rationale for the denial.
(3) If the attorney general deems the application incomplete, then the applicant shall be
notified, either by mail or by phone, within five (5) business days from submitting the application,
that the entire application is available for pick-up by the applicant along with a written response
stating the reason(s) why the application was deemed incomplete.
(i) The provisions of § 11-47-35 and § 11-47-35.2 shall not apply to persons licensed under
§11-47-18.
LC003293 - Page 11 of 19

(j) The attorney general’s renewal application for a license to carry a pistol or revolver shall
require the following:
(1) The applicant shall submit a fully complete, signed, dated and notarized renewal
application to the attorney general prior to the expiration date of the permit.
(2) The renewal application shall include only the information included in subsection (d)(1)
of this section and shall only contain the requirements included in subsection (d)(2) of this section,
with the following exceptions:
(i) The three (3) dated, signed and notarized typed reference letters from individuals who
personally know the applicant are not required upon renewal.
(ii) The fingerprint card requirement is not required upon renewal.
(3) The attorney general shall, within sixty (60) days of receipt of the renewal application,
if there is no material change in the applicant’s renewal application, no material change in need and
no change in the applicant’s criminal history, automatically approve the renewal application.
(k) The attorney general shall establish and maintain an emergency permit extension on the
renewal application for a license to carry a pistol or revolver.
(1) The emergency permit extension is only available to renewal applicants who, at the
time of the application, have an unexpired four (4) year attorney general license to carry a pistol or
revolver and who must maintain this license for work purposes.
(2) A complete renewal application shall be delivered to the department of attorney general
prior to the license expiration date.
(3) The attorney general shall, within three (3) business days of receipt of the renewal
application, if there is no material change in the applicant’s renewal application, no material change
in need and no change in the applicant’s criminal history, automatically approve and make available
the emergency permit.
(4) A fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be paid to the attorney general for the emergency
permit extension upon the issuance of the emergency permit.
(5) An emergency license to carry a pistol or revolver shall be valid for ninety (90) days
only.
(6) Nothing in the emergency permit extension section shall be construed or interpreted to
stay or toll the time periods in the renewal process as outlined in section (e) of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 11-47 of the General Laws entitled "Weapons" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-47-18.1. Review and appeal of the decision of the licensing authority or attorney
general.
LC003293 - Page 12 of 19

(a) A decision denying a firearms permit pursuant to either § 11-47-11 or § 11-47-18 shall
be final unless further review and/or appeal is initiated in writing within fifteen (15) days after the
decision has been mailed to the applicant at the address listed on the application.
(b) An aggrieved individual may submit a written request to reconsider the denial to the
licensing authority or the department of attorney general. Any request for reconsideration shall be
submitted within fifteen (15) days after the decision has been mailed to the address provided by the
applicant.
(1) The licensing authority or the department of attorney general shall schedule and conduct
an in-person meeting within thirty (30) days of the request to review and discuss the decision. Said
meeting shall only be scheduled or rescheduled beyond the initial thirty (30) day period by
agreement of the parties and/or for good cause, but in no event exceed sixty (60) days.
(2) The applicant may submit any supplemental documentation or written evidence relative
to the application, which shall become part of the application.
(3) The meeting shall be conducted as an informal meeting, not as an administrative
hearing. The licensing authority or the department of attorney general shall receive and consider
documents and other evidence without regard to statutory and common law rules. No stenographic
record, transcription, video, audio or other recording shall be allowed.
(4) The applicant may be represented by an attorney during the appeal process.
(5) The licensing authority or the department of attorney general shall within fourteen (14)
days after the meeting mail a decision to the applicant granting or denying the application. Any
denial shall be in writing and state with specificity the reason(s) and evidence upon which the denial
was based and the rationale for the denial.
(c) An aggrieved individual may submit an appeal of the decision denying a firearms permit
pursuant to the decision of the request to reconsider to the superior court of the State of Rhode
Island for the county in which the licensing authority or attorney general is located, in the form of
a miscellaneous petition, within fifteen (15) days after the decision has been mailed to the applicant
at the address listed on the application.
(1) The petition for review shall state the grounds upon which review is sought but need
not be verified.
(2) Upon appeal, the petitioner is entitled to a trial de novo before a justice of the superior
court without a jury.
(3) Within thirty (30) days of the filing of the notice of appeal, the licensing authority or
attorney general shall provide a full, complete and certified copy of the application and all
submitted documents to both the petitioner and the superior court.
LC003293 - Page 13 of 19

(d) Pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38, the request to reconsider and the appeal to superior
court, shall not be deemed public. All documents, records and proceedings before the licensing
authority, the department of attorney general and the superior court are not open to the public but
may be accessed by law enforcement personnel to be used for law enforcement purposes related to
the appeal only and shall otherwise remain confidential.
(e) An applicant may have their hearing open to the public upon written request to the
superior court.
(f) The superior court shall award reasonable attorney fees, costs and filing fees to the
prevailing applicant if the court finds that there is no justiciable issue of either law of fact or to the
prevailing applicant if the licensing authority or the department of attorney general did not have a
good faith basis in the denial of the license or permit.
SECTION 3. Section 38-2-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 38-2 entitled "Access to Public
Records" is hereby amended to read as follows:
38-2-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” or “public body” means any executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory, or
administrative body of the state, or any political subdivision thereof; including, but not limited to:
any department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, authority; any school, fire, or
water district, or other agency of Rhode Island state or local government that exercises
governmental functions; any authority as defined in § 42-35-1(b); or any other public or private
agency, person, partnership, corporation, or business entity acting on behalf of and/or in place of
any public agency.
(2) “Chief administrative officer” means the highest authority of the public body.
(3) “Public business” means any matter over which the public body has supervision,
control, jurisdiction, or advisory power.
(4) “Public record” or “public records” shall mean all documents, papers, letters, maps,
books, tapes, photographs, films, sound recordings, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data
processing records, computer stored data (including electronic mail messages, except specifically
for any electronic mail messages of or to elected officials with or relating to those they represent
and correspondence of or to elected officials in their official capacities), or other material regardless
of physical form or characteristics made or received pursuant to law or ordinance or in connection
with the transaction of official business by any agency. For the purposes of this chapter, the
following records shall not be deemed public:
(A)(I)(a) All records relating to a client/attorney relationship and to a doctor/patient
LC003293 - Page 14 of 19

relationship, including all medical information relating to an individual in any files.
(b) Personnel and other personal individually identifiable records otherwise deemed
confidential by federal or state law or regulation, or the disclosure of which would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 552 et seq.; provided,
however, with respect to employees, and employees of contractors and subcontractors working on
public works projects that are required to be listed as certified payrolls, the name, gross salary,
salary range, total cost of paid fringe benefits, gross amount received in overtime, and any other
remuneration in addition to salary, job title, job description, dates of employment and positions
held with the state, municipality, or public works contractor or subcontractor on public works
projects, employment contract, work location, and/or project, business telephone number, the city
or town of residence, and date of termination shall be public. For the purposes of this section
“remuneration” shall include any payments received by an employee as a result of termination, or
otherwise leaving employment, including, but not limited to, payments for accrued sick and/or
vacation time, severance pay, or compensation paid pursuant to a contract buy-out provision. For
purposes of this section, the city or town residence shall not be deemed public for peace officers,
as defined in § 12-7-21, and shall not be released.
(II) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, or any other provision of the general
laws to the contrary, the pension records of all persons who are either current or retired members
of any public retirement systems, as well as all persons who become members of those retirement
systems after June 17, 1991, shall be open for public inspection. “Pension records” as used in this
section, shall include all records containing information concerning pension and retirement benefits
of current and retired members of the retirement systems and future members of said systems,
including all records concerning retirement credits purchased and the ability of any member of the
retirement system to purchase retirement credits, but excluding all information regarding the
medical condition of any person and all information identifying the member’s designated
beneficiary or beneficiaries unless and until the member’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries
have received or are receiving pension and/or retirement benefits through the retirement system.
(B) Trade secrets and commercial or financial information obtained from a person, firm,
or corporation that is of a privileged or confidential nature.
(C) Child custody and adoption records, records of illegitimate births, and records of
juvenile proceedings before the family court.
(D) All records maintained by law enforcement agencies for criminal law enforcement and
all records relating to the detection and investigation of crime, including those maintained on any
individual or compiled in the course of a criminal investigation by any law enforcement agency.
LC003293 - Page 15 of 19

Provided, however, such records shall not be deemed public only to the extent that the disclosure
of the records or information (a) Could reasonably be expected to interfere with investigations of
criminal activity or with enforcement proceedings; (b) Would deprive a person of a right to a fair
trial or an impartial adjudication; (c) Could reasonably be expected to constitute an unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy; (d) Could reasonably be expected to disclose the identity of a
confidential source, including a state, local, or foreign agency or authority, or any private institution
that furnished information on a confidential basis, or the information furnished by a confidential
source; (e) Would disclose techniques and procedures for law enforcement investigations or
prosecutions, or would disclose guidelines for law enforcement investigations or prosecutions; or
(f) Could reasonably be expected to endanger the life or physical safety of any individual. Records
relating to management and direction of a law enforcement agency and records or reports reflecting
the initial arrest of an adult and the charge or charges brought against an adult shall be public.
(E) Any records that would not be available by law or rule of court to an opposing party in
litigation.
(F) Scientific and technological secrets and the security plans of military and law
enforcement agencies, the disclosure of which would endanger the public welfare and security.
(G) Any records that disclose the identity of the contributor of a bona fide and lawful
charitable contribution to the public body whenever public anonymity has been requested of the
public body with respect to the contribution by the contributor.
(H) Reports and statements of strategy or negotiation involving labor negotiations or
collective bargaining.
(I) Reports and statements of strategy or negotiation with respect to the investment or
borrowing of public funds, until such time as those transactions are entered into.
(J) Any minutes of a meeting of a public body that are not required to be disclosed pursuant
to chapter 46 of title 42.
(K) Preliminary drafts, notes, impressions, memoranda, working papers, and work
products, including those involving research at state institutions of higher education on commercial,
scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issues, whether in electronic or other format; provided,
however, any documents submitted at a public meeting of a public body shall be deemed public.
(L) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a licensing
examination, examination for employment or promotion, or academic examinations; provided,
however, that a person shall have the right to review the results of his or her examination.
(M) Correspondence of or to elected officials with or relating to those they represent and
correspondence of or to elected officials in their official capacities.
LC003293 - Page 16 of 19

(N) The contents of real estate appraisals, engineering, or feasibility estimates and
evaluations made for or by an agency relative to the acquisition of property or to prospective public
supply and construction contracts, until such time as all of the property has been acquired or all
proceedings or transactions have been terminated or abandoned; provided the law of eminent
domain shall not be affected by this provision.
(O) All tax returns.
(P) All investigatory records of public bodies, with the exception of law enforcement
agencies, pertaining to possible violations of statute, rule, or regulation other than records of final
actions taken, provided that all records prior to formal notification of violations or noncompliance
shall not be deemed to be public.
(Q) Records of individual test scores on professional certification and licensing
examinations; provided, however, that a person shall have the right to review the results of his or
her examination.
(R) Requests for advisory opinions until such time as the public body issues its opinion.
(S) Records, reports, opinions, information, and statements required to be kept confidential
by federal law or regulation or state law or rule of court.
(T) Judicial bodies are included in the definition only in respect to their administrative
function provided that records kept pursuant to the provisions of chapter 16 of title 8 are exempt
from the operation of this chapter.
(U) Library records that, by themselves or when examined with other public records, would
reveal the identity of the library user requesting, checking out, or using any library materials.
(V) Printouts from TELE — TEXT devices used by people who are deaf or hard of hearing
or speech impaired.
(W) All records received by the insurance division of the department of business regulation
from other states, either directly or through the National Association of Insurance Commissioners,
if those records are accorded confidential treatment in that state. Nothing contained in this title or
any other provision of law shall prevent or be construed as prohibiting the commissioner of
insurance from disclosing otherwise confidential information to the insurance department of this
or any other state or country, at any time, so long as the agency or office receiving the records
agrees in writing to hold it confidential in a manner consistent with the laws of this state.
(X) Credit card account numbers in the possession of state or local government are
confidential and shall not be deemed public records.
(Y) Any documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or oral testimony
provided under any subpoena issued under § 9-1.1-6.
LC003293 - Page 17 of 19

(Z) Any individually identifiable evaluations of public school employees made pursuant to
state or federal law or regulation.
(AA) All documents prepared by school districts intended to be used by school districts in
protecting the safety of their students from potential and actual threats.
(BB) The list of teachers terminated for good and just cause maintained by the department
of education pursuant to § 16-13-9.
(CC) All documents, records, and any records of proceedings generated pursuant to any
appeal brought under § 11-47-18.1, before a licensing authority, the department of attorney general
or the superior court.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003293
========
LC003293 - Page 18 of 19